Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.100

Copy of order serves as writ.

It shall not be necessary to issue a writ of injunction, but the clerk shall issue a copy of the order of injunction duly certified by him or her, which shall be forthwith served by delivering the same to the adverse party.

[ 2011 c 336 s 196; Code 1881 s 161; 1877 p 33 s 161; 1869 p 39 s 159; 1854 p 153 s 119; RRS s 727.]